bg-BG: Форма на сок: Концентрат; Замразен концентрат; Паста; Прах; Единична концентрация; Стик/пакетче; Друго
fr: Forme du jus: Concentré; Concentré congelé; Pâte; Poudre; Pur jus; Bâtonnet/sachet; Autre
vi: Dạng nước ép: Cô đặc; Cô đặc đông lạnh; Dạng nhão; Dạng bột; Ép nguyên chất; Que/gói; Khác
hr-HR: Oblik soka: Koncentrat; Smrznuti koncentrat; Pasta; Prah; Nerazrijeđeni sok; Štapić/paketić; Ostalo
da: Juiceform: Koncentrat; Frossent koncentrat; Pasta; Pulver; Enkeltstyrke; Stick/pakke; Andet
ru: Форма сока: Концентрат; Замороженный концентрат; Паста; Порошок; Прямого отжима; Стик/пакетик; Другое
el: Μορφή χυμού: Συμπυκνωμένος; Κατεψυγμένος συμπυκνωμένος; Πάστα; Σκόνη; Κανονικός (single strength); Στικ/πακέτο; Άλλο
en: Juice form: Concentrate; Frozen concentrate; Paste; Powder; Single strength; Stick/packet; Other
nb: Juicens form: Konsentrat; Frossent konsentrat; Pasta; Pulver; Single strength; Pinne/pakke; Annet
sk-SK: Forma šťavy: Koncentrát; Mrazený koncentrát; Pasta; Prášok; Jednoduchá koncentrácia; Tyčinka/vrecúško; Iné
zh-TW: 果汁形式: 濃縮; 冷凍濃縮; 膏狀; 粉末; 原汁; 條狀/包裝; 其他
de: Form des Safts: Konzentrat; Gefrorenes Konzentrat; Paste; Pulver; Direktsaft; Stick/Päckchen; Sonstige
fi: Mehun olomuoto: Tiiviste; Pakastettu tiiviste; Tahna; Jauhe; Käyttövalmis; Puikko/pakkaus; Muu
ro-RO: Forma sucului: Concentrat; Concentrat congelat; Pastă; Pudră; Concentrație naturală; Pliculeț/pachet; Altele
zh-CN: 果汁形态: 浓缩汁; 冷冻浓缩汁; 糊状; 粉状; 原汁（非浓缩还原）; 条状/袋装; 其他
hu: Lé formája: Sűrítmény; Fagyasztott sűrítmény; Paszta; Por; Hígítatlan (single strength); Tasak/rúd; Egyéb
sl-SI: Oblika soka: Koncentrat; Zamrznjen koncentrat; Pasta; V prahu; Standardna jakost; Zavojček/vrečka; Drugo
pt-PT: Forma do sumo: Concentrado; Concentrado congelado; Pasta; Pó; Sumo não concentrado; Saqueta/pacote; Outro
ko: 주스 형태: 농축액; 냉동 농축액; 페이스트; 분말; 싱글 스트렝스; 스틱/패킷; 기타
ja: ジュースの形: 濃縮; 冷凍濃縮; ペースト; パウダー; ストレート; スティック/パケット; その他
it: Forma del succo: Concentrato; Concentrato congelato; Pasta; Polvere; Succo puro; Stick/bustina; Altro
lt-LT: Sulčių forma: Koncentratas; Užšaldytas koncentratas; Pasta; Milteliai; Nekoncentruotos; Lazdelė / pakelis; Kita
pt-BR: Suco formato: Concentrado; Concentrado congelado; Pasta; Em pó; Força simples; Bastão/pacote; Outro
sv: Juiceform: Koncentrat; Fryst koncentrat; Pasta; Pulver; Drickfärdig; Stick/portion; Annat
nl: Sap vorm: Concentraat; Bevroren concentraat; Pasta; Poeder; Niet-geconcentreerd; Stick/zakje; Overig
pl: Forma soku: Koncentrat; Mrożony koncentrat; Pasta; Proszek; Nierozcieńczony; Saszetka/paluszek; Inna
th: รูปแบบน้ำผลไม้: เข้มข้น; เข้มข้นแช่แข็ง; เพสต์; ผง; พร้อมดื่ม; แบบซอง; อื่นๆ
cs: Typ džusu: Koncentrát; Mražený koncentrát; Pasta; Prášek; Přírodní šťáva (NFC); Sáček/tyčinka; Jiné
tr: Meyve suyu formu: Konsantre; Dondurulmuş konsantre; Püre; Toz; Konsantre olmayan; Çubuk/paket; Diğer
es: Formato del jugo: Concentrado; Concentrado congelado; Pasta; Polvo; Concentración única; Sobre/paquete; Otra